Georgia statutes. TITLE 11 Commercial Code
PART 2 General Definitions and Principles of Interpretation

11-1-201.
General definitions.

Unless the context otherwise requires, words or phrases defined in this Code section, or in the additional definitions contained in other articles of this title that apply to particular articles or parts thereof, have the meanings stated.

Subject to additional definitions contained in the other articles of this title that are applicable to specific articles or parts thereof, in this title:

“Action” in the sense of a judicial proceeding includes recoupment, counterclaim, setoff, suit in equity, and any other proceedings in which rights are determined.

“Aggrieved party” means a party entitled to pursue a remedy.

“Agreement,” as distinguished from “contract,” means the bargain of the parties in fact as found in their language or inferred from other circumstances including course of performance, course of dealing, or usage of trade as provided in Code Section 11-1-303.

“Bank” means a person engaged in the business of banking and includes a savings bank, savings and loan association, credit union, or trust company.

“Bearer” means a person in control of a negotiable instrument, document of title, or certificated security payable to bearer or indorsed in blank.

“Bill of lading” means a document evidencing the receipt of goods for shipment issued by a person engaged in the business of transporting or forwarding goods.

“Branch” includes a separately incorporated foreign branch of a bank.

“Burden of establishing” a fact means the burden of persuading the trier of fact that the existence of the fact is more probable than its nonexistence.

“Buyer in ordinary course of business” means a person that buys goods in good faith without knowledge that the sale violates the rights of another person in the goods, and in the ordinary course from a person, other than a pawnbroker, in the business of selling goods of that kind. A person buys goods in the ordinary course if the sale to the person comports with the usual or customary practices in the kind of business in which the seller is engaged or with the seller’s own usual or customary practices. A person that sells oil, gas, or other minerals at the wellhead or minehead is a person in the business of selling goods of that kind. A buyer in the ordinary course of business may buy for cash, by exchange of other property, or on secured or unsecured credit, and may acquire goods or documents of title under a preexisting contract for sale. Only a buyer that takes possession of the goods or has a right to recover the goods from the seller under Article 2 of this title may be a buyer in ordinary course of business. A person that acquires goods in a transfer in bulk or as security for or in total or partial satisfaction of a money debt is not a buyer in ordinary course of business.

“Conspicuous,” with reference to a term, means so written, displayed, or presented that a reasonable person against which it is to operate ought to have noticed it. Whether a term is “conspicuous” or not is a decision for the court. Conspicuous terms include the following:

A heading in capitals equal to or greater in size than the surrounding text, or in contrasting type, font, or color to the surrounding text of the same or lesser size; and

Language in the body of a record or display in larger type than the surrounding text, or in contrasting type, font, or color to the surrounding text of the same size, or set off from the surrounding text of the same size by symbols or other marks that call attention to the language.

“Consumer” means an individual who enters into a transaction primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

“Contract,” as distinguished from “agreement,” means the total legal obligation that results from the parties’ agreement as determined by this title and any other applicable law.

“Creditor” includes a general creditor, a secured creditor, a lien creditor and any representative of creditors, including an assignee for the benefit of creditors, a trustee in bankruptcy, a receiver in equity, and an executor or administrator of an insolvent debtor’s or assignor’s estate.

“Defendant” includes a person in the position of defendant in a counterclaim, cross-claim, or third-party claim.

“Delivery” with respect to an instrument, document of title, or chattel paper means voluntary transfer of possession.

“Document of title” includes a bill of lading, dock warrant, dock receipt, warehouse receipt, or order for delivery of goods and any other document which in the regular course of business or financing is treated as adequately evidencing that the person in possession of it is entitled to receive, hold, and dispose of the document and the goods it covers. To be a document of title, a document must purport to be issued by or addressed to a bailee and purport to cover goods in the bailee’s possession which are either identified or are fungible portions of an identified mass.

“Fault” means a default, breach, or wrongful act or omission.

“Fungible goods” means:

Goods of which any unit is, by nature or usage of trade, the equivalent of any other like unit; or

Goods that by agreement are treated as equivalent.

“Genuine” means free of forgery or counterfeiting.

“Good faith,” except as otherwise provided in Article 5 of this title, means honesty in fact and the observance of reasonable commercial standards of fair dealing.

“Holder” means:

The person in possession of a negotiable instrument that is payable either to bearer or to an identified person that is the person in possession; or

The person in possession of a document of title if the goods are deliverable either to bearer or to the order of the person in possession.

“Insolvency proceeding” includes any assignment for the benefit of creditors or other proceeding intended to liquidate or rehabilitate the estate of the person involved.

“Insolvent” means:

Having generally ceased to pay debts in the ordinary course of business other than as a result of bona fide dispute;

Being unable to pay debts as they become due; or

Being insolvent within the meaning of the federal bankruptcy law.

“Money” means a medium of exchange authorized or adopted by a domestic or foreign government and includes a monetary unit of account established by an intergovernmental organization or by agreement between two or more countries.

“Organization” means a person other than an individual.

“Party,” as distinct from “third party,” means a person who has engaged in a transaction or made an agreement subject to this title.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, public corporation, or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Present value” means the amount as of a date certain of one or more sums payable in the future, discounted to the date certain by use of either an interest rate specified by the parties if that rate is not manifestly unreasonable at the time the transaction is entered into or, if an interest rate is not so specified, a commercially reasonable rate that takes into account the facts and circumstances at the time the transaction is entered into.

“Purchase” means taking by sale, discount, negotiation, mortgage, pledge, lien, security interest, issue or reissue, gift, or any other voluntary transaction creating an interest in property.

“Purchaser” means a person who takes by purchase.

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

“Remedy” means any remedial right to which an aggrieved party is entitled with or without resort to a tribunal.

“Representative” means a person empowered to act for another, including an agent, an officer of a corporation or association, and a trustee, executor or administrator of an estate.

“Rights” includes remedies.

“Security interest” means an interest in personal property or fixtures which secures payment or performance of an obligation. The term also includes any interest of a consignor and a buyer of accounts, chattel paper, a payment intangible, or a promissory note in a transaction that is subject to Article 9 of this title. The term does not include the special property interest of a buyer of goods on identification of those goods to a contract for sale under Code Section 11-2-401, but a buyer may also acquire a “security interest” by complying with Article 9 of this title. Except as otherwise provided in Code Section 11-2-505, the right of a seller or lessor of goods under Article 2 or 2A of this title to retain or acquire possession of the goods is not a “security interest,” but a seller or lessor may also acquire a “security interest” by complying with Article 9 of this title. The retention or reservation of title by a seller of goods notwithstanding shipment or delivery to the buyer under Code Section 11-2-401 is limited in effect to a reservation of a “security interest.”

Whether a transaction in the form of a lease creates a “security interest” shall be determined pursuant to Code Section 11-1-203.

“Send” in connection with a writing, record, or notice means:

To deposit in the mail or deliver for transmission by any other usual means of communication with postage or cost of transmission provided for and properly addressed and, in the case of an instrument, to an address specified thereon or otherwise agreed, or if there be none to any address reasonable under the circumstances; or

In any other way to cause to be received any record or notice within the time it would have arrived if properly sent.

“Signed” includes using any symbol executed or adopted with present intention to adopt or accept a writing.

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

“Surety” includes a guarantor or other secondary obligor.

“Term” means that portion of an agreement that relates to a particular matter.

“Unauthorized signature” means a signature made without actual, implied, or apparent authority. The term includes a forgery.

“Warehouse receipt” means a receipt issued by a person engaged in the business of storing goods for hire.

“Written” or “writing” includes printing, typewriting, or any other intentional reduction to tangible form.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-1—201, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 188, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1081, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1981, p. 634, § 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 825, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 11; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2626, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 633, § 3; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1306, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 136, § 11; Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 3; Ga. L. 2010, p. 481, § 2-1/HB 451; Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 3A-1/SB 65.

The 2000 amendment,

effective March 16, 2000, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “mean ‘branch office’ as that term is” for “mean not only ‘branch bank,’ but also ‘bank office’ and ‘bank facility’ as those terms are” in the last sentence of subsection (4).

The 2001 amendment,

effective July 1, 2001, rewrote subsection (9), inserted “security interest,” in subsection (32), and, in the first paragraph of subsection (37), deleted the former second sentence, which read “The retention or reservation of title by a seller of goods notwithstanding shipment or delivery to the buyer (Code Section 11-2-401) is limited in effect to a reservation of a ‘security interest.’ ”, in the current second sentence, inserted “consignor and a”, and substituted “accounts, chattel paper, a payment intangible, or a promissory note in a transaction that” for “accounts or chattel paper which”, deleted the former fifth sentence, which read “Unless a consignment is intended as security, reservation of title thereunder is not a ‘security interest,’ but a consignment in any event is subject to the provisions on consignment sales (Code Section 11-2-326).”, and added the last two sentences.

The 2010 amendment,

effective May 27, 2010, in subsection (5), substituted “a person in control of a negotiable electronic document of title or” for “the” near the beginning, inserted “a negotiable tangible”, and inserted “a”; substituted the present provisions of subsection (6) for the former provisions, which read: “ ‘Bill of lading’ means a document evidencing the receipt of goods for shipment issued by a person engaged in the business of transporting or forwarding goods, and includes an airbill. ‘Airbill’ means a document serving for air transportation as a bill of lading does for marine or rail transportation, and includes an air consignment note or air waybill.”; rewrote subsection (10); substituted “to an electronic document of title means voluntary transfer of control and with respect to instruments, tangible” for “to instruments,” in the middle of subsection (14); rewrote subsections (15), (20), (25), and (26); in subsection (27), substituted “the individual’s” for “his” near the end of the first sentence and added the last two sentences; in subsection (38), substituted “a writing, a record, or notice means:” for “any writing or notice means” at the end of the introductory paragraph, designated the paragraphs, in paragraph (38)(a), inserted commas throughout, substituted “To deposit” for “to deposit” at the beginning and substituted “; or” for a period at the end, and, in paragraph (38)(b), substituted “In any other way to cause to be received any record” for “The receipt of any writing” at the beginning, deleted “at which” following “time” in the middle, and deleted “has the effect of a proper sending” following “properly” at the end; and substituted “document of title” for “receipt” in the middle of subsection (45). See the Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, rewrote this Code section.

11-1-202.
Notice; knowledge.

Subject to subsection (f) of this Code section, a person has “notice” of a fact if the person:

Has actual knowledge of it;

Has received a notice or notification of it; or

From all the facts and circumstances known to the person at the time in question, has reason to know that it exists.

“Knows” or “knowledge” means actual knowledge.

“Discover,” “learn,” or words of similar import refer to knowledge rather than to reason to know.

A person “notifies” or “gives” a notice or notification to another person by taking such steps as may be reasonably required to inform the other person in the ordinary course, whether or not the other person actually comes to know of it.

Subject to subsection (f) of this Code section, a person “receives” a notice or notification when:

It comes to that person’s attention; or

It is duly delivered in a form reasonable under the circumstances at the place of business through which the contract was made or at another location held out by that person as the place for receipt of such communications.

Notice, knowledge, or a notice or notification received by an organization shall be effective for a particular transaction from the time it is brought to the attention of the individual conducting that transaction and, in any event, from the time it would have been brought to the individual’s attention if the organization had exercised due diligence. An organization exercises due diligence if it maintains reasonable routines for communicating significant information to the person conducting the transaction and there is reasonable compliance with the routines. Due diligence does not require an individual acting for the organization to communicate information unless the communication is part of the individual’s regular duties or the individual has reason to know of the transaction and that the transaction would be materially affected by the information.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-1—202, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 3A-1/SB 65; Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 11/HB 737.

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “A document in due form purporting to be a bill of lading, policy or certificate of insurance, official weigher’s or inspector’s certificate, consular invoice, or any other document authorized or required by the contract to be issued by a third party shall be prima facie evidence of its own authenticity and genuineness and of the facts stated in the document by the third party.”

The 2016 amendment,

effective May 3, 2016, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “a notice or notification” for “notice or notification” in subsection (e).

11-1-203.
Lease distinguished from security interest.

Whether a transaction in the form of a lease creates a security interest is determined by the facts of each case.

A transaction in the form of a lease creates a security interest if the consideration that the lessee is to pay to the lessor for the right to possession and use of the goods is an obligation for the term of the lease and is not subject to termination by the lessee, and:

The original term of the lease is equal to or greater than the remaining economic life of the goods;

The lessee is bound to renew the lease for the remaining economic life of the goods or is bound to become the owner of the goods;

The lessee has an option to renew the lease for the remaining economic life of the goods for no additional consideration or nominal additional consideration upon compliance with the lease agreement; or

The lessee has an option to become the owner of the goods for no additional consideration or nominal additional consideration upon compliance with the lease agreement.

A transaction in the form of a lease does not create a security interest merely because:

The present value of the consideration the lessee is obligated to pay the lessor for the right to possession and use of the goods is substantially equal to or is greater than the fair market value of the goods at the time the lease is entered into;

The lessee assumes risk of loss of the goods;

The lessee agrees to pay, with respect to the goods, taxes, insurance, filing, recording, or registration fees, or service or maintenance costs;

The lessee has an option to renew the lease or to become the owner of the goods;

The lessee has an option to renew the lease for a fixed rent that is equal to or greater than the reasonably predictable fair market rent for the use of the goods for the term of the renewal at the time the option is to be performed; or

The lessee has an option to become the owner of the goods for a fixed price that is equal to or greater than the reasonably predictable fair market value of the goods at the time the option is to be performed.

Additional consideration is nominal if it is less than the lessee’s reasonably predictable cost of performing under the lease agreement if the option is not exercised. Additional consideration is not nominal if:

When the option to renew the lease is granted to the lessee, the rent is stated to be the fair market rent for the use of the goods for the term of the renewal determined at the time the option is to be performed; or

When the option to become the owner of the goods is granted to the lessee, the price is stated to be the fair market value of the goods determined at the time the option is to be performed.

The “remaining economic life of the goods” and “reasonably predictable” fair market rent, fair market value, or cost of performing under the lease agreement must be determined with reference to the facts and circumstances at the time the transaction is entered into.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-1—203, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 3A-1/SB 65.

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “Every contract or duty within this title imposes an obligation of good faith in its performance or enforcement.”

Section construed. —

O.C.G.A. §11-1-203 in effect states that what is not regulated by contract should be done in such a way as to show good faith in carrying out of what is expressed. Fulton Nat'l Bank v. Willis Denney Ford, Inc., 154 Ga. App. 846, 269 S.E.2d 916 (1980).

O.C.G.A. §11-1-203 does not state a cause of action

for which a claim of relief may be granted. Management Assistance, Inc. v. Computer Dimensions, Inc., 546 F. Supp. 666 (N.D. Ga. 1982), aff'd, 747 F.2d 708 (11th Cir. 1984).

11-1-204.
Value.

Except as otherwise provided in Articles 3, 4, 5, and 6 of this title, a person gives value for rights if the person acquires them:

In return for a binding commitment to extend credit or for the extension of immediately available credit, whether or not drawn upon and whether or not a charge-back is provided for in the event of difficulties in collection;

As security for, or in total or partial satisfaction of, a preexisting claim;

By accepting delivery under a preexisting contract for purchase; or

In return for any consideration sufficient to support a simple contract.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-1-204, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 3A-1/SB 65.

11-1-205.
Reasonable time; seasonableness.

Whether a time for taking any action required by this title is reasonable depends on the nature, purpose, and circumstances of such action.

An action is taken “seasonably” if it is taken at or within the time agreed, or if no time is agreed, at or within a reasonable time.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-1—204, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1; Code 1981, §11-1-205, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 3A-1/SB 65.

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, redesignated former Code Section 11-1-204 as present Code Section 11-1-205; and
substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “(1) Whenever this title requires any action to be taken within a reasonable time, any time which is not manifestly unreasonable may be fixed by agreement.

“(2) What is a reasonable time for taking any action depends on the nature, purpose, and circumstances of such action.

“(3) An action is taken ‘seasonably’ when it is taken at or within the time agreed or if no time is agreed at or within a reasonable time.”

11-1-206.
Presumptions.

Whenever this title creates a “presumption” with respect to a fact, or provides that a fact is “presumed,” the trier of fact must find the existence of the fact presumed unless and until evidence is introduced that supports a finding of its nonexistence.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-1—206, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1323, § 16; Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 3A-1/SB 65.

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “(1) Except in the cases described in subsection (2) of this Code section a contract for the sale of personal property is not enforceable by way of action or defense beyond $5,000.00 in amount or value of remedy unless there is some writing which indicates that a contract for sale has been made between the parties at a defined or stated price, reasonably identifies the subject matter, and is signed by the party against whom enforcement is sought or by his authorized agent.

“(2) Subsection (1) of this Code section does not apply to contracts for the sale of goods (Code Section 11-2-201) nor of securities (Code Section 11-8-113) nor to security agreements (Code Section 11-9-203).”

11-1-207 through 11-1-209.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 3A-1/SB 65, effective January 1, 2016.